Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,214
Application; valid; when.

Any complete application shall be considered a valid application on the date submitted for the purposes of the Nebraska Rural Projects Act.

Laws 2021, LB40, § 20.